Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-183] Articles of amendment. A
corporation amending its articles shall deliver to the department director
articles of amendment setting forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The text of each amendment adopted;

(3) The date of each amendment's adoption;

(4) If approval of members was not required, a
statement to that effect and a statement that the amendment was approved by a
sufficient vote of the board of directors or incorporators;

(5) If approval by members was required:

(A) The designation, number of memberships
outstanding, number of votes entitled to be cast by each class entitled to vote
separately on the amendment, and number of votes of each class indisputably
voting on the amendment; and

(B) Either the total number of votes cast for
and against the amendment by each class entitled to vote separately on the
amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by
each class and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by each class
was sufficient for approval by that class;

(6) If approval of the amendment by some person or
persons other than the members, the board, or the incorporators is required
pursuant to section 414D‑188, a statement that the approval was obtained.
[L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next